South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5524.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 7, Chapter 3, Title 23 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 23-3-537. It is unlawful for a person registered as a sex offender pursuant to the provisions of this article to enter upon, remain in, or loiter upon the grounds of a municipal, county, or special purpose district park without being given expressed permission by the park's governing authority. A registered sex offender who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be fined not less than one hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars, or imprisoned for not more than thirty days. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----